Nevada, session 83, SB318.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 388A.153 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388A.153 1. The State Public Charter School Authority
consists of nine members. The membership of the State Public
Charter School Authority consists of:
(a) Two members appointed by the Governor in accordance with
subsection 2;
(b) Two members, who must not be Legislators, appointed by
the Majority Leader of the Senate in accordance with subsection 2;
(c) Two members, who must not be Legislators, appointed by
the Speaker of the Assembly in accordance with subsection 2;
(d) Two members appointed by the State Board of Education;
and
(e) One member appointed by the Charter School Association of
Nevada or its successor organization.
-
*SB318_R1*

– 3 –
2. The Governor, the Majority Leader of the Senate, the
Speaker of the Assembly and the State Board of Education shall
ensure that the membership of the State Public Charter School
Authority:
(a) Includes persons with a demonstrated understanding of
charter schools and a commitment to using charter schools as a way
to strengthen public education in this State;
(b) Includes a parent or legal guardian of a pupil enrolled in a
charter school in this State;
(c) Includes persons with specific knowledge of:
(1) Issues relating to elementary and secondary education;
(2) School finance or accounting, or both;
(3) Management practices;
(4) Assessments required in elementary and secondary
education;
(5) Educational technology; and
(6) The laws and regulations applicable to charter schools;
(d) Insofar as practicable, reflects the ethnic and geographical
diversity of this State; and
(e) Insofar as practicable, consists of persons who are experts on
best practices for authorizing charter schools and developing and
operating high-quality charter schools and charter management
organizations.
3. Each member of the State Public Charter School Authority
must be a resident of this State.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a member of
the State Public Charter School Authority must not be actively
engaged in business with or hold a direct pecuniary interest relating
to charter schools, including, without limitation, serving as a vendor,
contractor, employee, officer, director or member of the governing
body of a charter school [, educational management organization] or
charter management organization.
5. Not more than two members of the State Public Charter
School Authority may be teachers or administrators who are
employed by a charter school or charter management organization in
this State. For a teacher or administrator employed by a charter
school or charter management organization to be eligible to serve as
a member of the State Public Charter School Authority, the charter
school or charter management organization which employs the
teacher or administrator must not have ever received an annual
rating established as one of the three lowest ratings of performance
pursuant to the statewide system of accountability for public
schools.
6. After the initial terms, the term of each member of the State
Public Charter School Authority is 3 years, commencing on July 1
-
*SB318_R1*

– 4 –
of the year in which he or she is appointed. A vacancy in the
membership of the State Public Charter School Authority must be
filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as
the original appointment. A member shall continue to serve on the
State Public Charter School Authority until his or her successor is
appointed.
7. The members of the State Public Charter School Authority
shall select a Chair and Vice Chair from among its members. After
the initial selection of those officers, each of those officers holds the
position for a term of 2 years commencing on July 1 of each odd-
numbered year. If a vacancy occurs in the Chair or Vice Chair, the
vacancy must be filled in the same manner as the original selection
for the remainder of the unexpired term.
8. Each member of the State Public Charter School Authority
is entitled to receive:
(a) For each day or portion of a day during which he or she
attends a meeting of the State Public Charter School Authority a
salary of not more than $80, as fixed by the State Public Charter
School Authority; and
(b) For each day or portion of a day during which he or she
attends a meeting of the State Public Charter School Authority or is
otherwise engaged in the business of the State Public Charter School
Authority the per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for
state officers and employees generally.
Sec. 2. NRS 388A.165 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.165 1. The State Public Charter School Authority may
enter into a contract with any qualified person to:
(a) Foster the development of high-quality charter management
organizations [, educational management organizations] and other
persons to operate charter schools in this State;
(b) Solicit applications to form charter schools from high-quality
applicants;
(c) Provide training concerning the governance and management
of charter schools to governing bodies of charter schools and
applicants to form charter schools; or
(d) Provide professional development and support services to
the administration and other employees of charter schools.
2. The State Public Charter School Authority may provide
compensation pursuant to a contract entered into pursuant to
subsection 1 using any money raised by the State Public Charter
School Authority from private donors for that purpose or any money
received from fees paid to the State Public Charter School
Authority.
-
*SB318_R1*

– 5 –
Sec. 3. NRS 388A.199 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.199 1. The State Public Charter School Authority may
employ such persons as it deems necessary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter. The staff employed by the State Public
Charter School Authority must be qualified to carry out the daily
responsibilities of sponsoring charter schools, including, without
limitation, oversight of charter contracts, in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter.
2. The staff must include:
(a) Attorneys with experience with laws concerning education,
special education and nonprofit organizations;
(b) Persons with experience overseeing the annual audits and
financial operations of school districts, nonprofit organizations or
corporations;
(c) Persons with experience conducting assessments and
evaluations for a school district;
(d) Administrators with significant experience overseeing
special education programs and programs while employed by a
school district, charter management organization [, educational
management organization] or other operator of charter schools;
(e) Policy analysts with significant experience in the areas of
charter schools and education policy; and
(f) Any other persons that the State Public Charter School
Authority determines are necessary.
3. The State Public Charter School Authority shall periodically
evaluate and make decisions concerning the number of persons
employed by the State Public Charter School Authority and the
qualifications and compensation of such persons based on guidance
from the National Association of Charter School Authorizers, or its
successor organization, an assessment of the strategic plan for
recruiting operators of charter schools prepared pursuant to NRS
388A.223 and the needs of the charter schools sponsored by the
State Public Charter School Authority.
Sec. 4. NRS 388A.223 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.223 1. Each sponsor of a charter school shall carry out
the following duties and powers:
(a) Evaluating applications to form charter schools as prescribed
by NRS 388A.249 . [;]
(b) Approving applications to form charter schools that the
sponsor determines are high quality, meet the identified educational
needs of pupils and will serve to promote the diversity of public
educational choices in this State . [;]
(c) Declining to approve applications to form charter schools
that do not satisfy the requirements of NRS 388A.249 . [;]
-
*SB318_R1*

– 6 –
(d) Negotiating, developing and executing charter contracts
pursuant to NRS 388A.270 . [;]
(e) Monitoring, in accordance with this chapter and in
accordance with the terms and conditions of the applicable charter
contract, the performance and compliance of each charter school
sponsored by the entity . [;]
(f) Determining whether the charter contract of a charter school
that the entity sponsors merits renewal or whether the renewal of the
charter contract should be denied or whether the charter contract
should be terminated or restarted, as applicable, in accordance with
NRS 388A.285, 388A.300 or 388A.330, as applicable . [;]
(g) Determining whether the governing body of a charter school
should be reconstituted in accordance with NRS 388A.330 . [;]
(h) Adopting a policy for appointing a new governing body of a
charter school for which the governing body is reconstituted in
accordance with NRS 388A.330 . [; and]
(i) Conducting site evaluations of each campus of a charter
school it sponsors during the first, third and fifth years after entering
into or renewing a charter contract. Such evaluations must include,
without limitation, evaluating pupil achievement and school
performance at each campus of the charter school and identifying
any deficiencies relating to pupil achievement and school
performance. The sponsor shall develop a plan with the charter
school to correct any such deficiencies. A sponsor may conduct a
brief evaluation of a charter school in the third year if the charter
school receives, in the immediately preceding year, one of the two
highest ratings of performance pursuant to the statewide system of
accountability for public schools.
(j) Ensuring that each charter school complies with the
provisions of NRS 338.013 to 338.090, inclusive, and, except as
otherwise provided in NRS 388A.635, with the provisions of
chapter 338 of NRS regarding competitive bidding for any project
for which the charter school provides written notification to the
sponsor pursuant to subsection 5 of NRS 388A.378. If the sponsor
of a charter school fails to ensure that the charter school complies
with the provisions of:
(1) NRS 338.013 to 338.090, inclusive, the sponsor may be
liable for an administrative penalty imposed by the Labor
Commissioner, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, of
not more than $5,000 for each violation of those provisions by the
charter school.
(2) Chapter 338 of NRS regarding competitive bidding, the
contract for the project is void.
2. Each sponsor of a charter school shall develop policies and
practices that are consistent with state laws and regulations
-
*SB318_R1*

– 7 –
governing charter schools. In developing the policies and practices,
the sponsor shall review and evaluate nationally recognized policies
and practices for sponsoring organizations of charter schools. The
policies and practices must include, without limitation:
(a) The organizational capacity and infrastructure of the sponsor
for sponsorship of charter schools, which must not be described as a
limit on the number of charter schools the sponsor will approve;
(b) The procedure and criteria for soliciting and evaluating
charter school applications in accordance with NRS 388A.249,
which must include, without limitation:
(1) Specific application procedures and timelines for
committees to form a charter school that plan to enter into a contract
with [an educational management organization to operate the charter
school,] committees to form a charter school that do not plan to
enter into such a contract and charter management organizations;
and
(2) A description of the manner in which the sponsor will
evaluate the previous performance of [an educational management
organization or other] a person with whom a committee to form a
charter school plans to enter into a contract to operate a charter
school or a charter management organization that submits an
application to form a charter school;
(c) The procedure and criteria for evaluating applications for
renewal of charter contracts pursuant to NRS 388A.285;
(d) The procedure for amending a charter contract and the
criteria for determining whether a request for such an amendment
will be approved which must include, without limitation, any
manner in which such procedures and criteria will differ if the
sponsor determines that the amendment is material or strategically
important;
(e) If deemed appropriate by the sponsor, a strategic plan for
recruiting charter management organizations [, educational
management organizations] or other persons to operate charter
schools based on the priorities of the sponsor and the needs of the
pupils that will be served by the charter schools that will be
sponsored by the sponsor;
(f) A description of how the sponsor will maintain oversight of
the charter schools it sponsors, which must include, without
limitation:
(1) An assessment of the needs of the charter schools that are
sponsored by the sponsor that is prepared with the input of the
governing bodies of such charter schools; and
(2) A strategic plan for the oversight and provision of
technical support to charter schools that are sponsored by the
-
*SB318_R1*

– 8 –
sponsor in the areas of academic, fiscal and organizational
performance; and
(g) A description of the process of evaluation for the charter
schools it sponsors in accordance with NRS 388A.351.
3. Evidence of material or persistent failure to carry out the
powers and duties of a sponsor prescribed by this section constitutes
grounds for revocation of the entity’s authority to sponsor charter
schools.
4. The provisions of this section do not establish a private right
of action against the sponsor of a charter school.
Sec. 5. NRS 388A.246 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.246 An application to form a charter school must include
all information prescribed by the Department by regulation and:
1. A summary of the plan for the proposed charter school.
2. A clear written description of the mission of the charter
school and the goals for the charter school. A charter school must
have as its stated purpose at least one of the following goals:
(a) Improving the academic achievement of pupils;
(b) Encouraging the use of effective and innovative methods of
teaching;
(c) Providing an accurate measurement of the educational
achievement of pupils;
(d) Establishing accountability and transparency of public
schools;
(e) Providing a method for public schools to measure
achievement based upon the performance of the schools; or
(f) Creating new professional opportunities for teachers.
3. A clear description of the indicators, measures and metrics
for the categories of academics, finances and organization that the
charter school proposes to use, the external assessments that will be
used to assess performance in those categories and the objectives
that the committee to form a charter school plans to achieve in those
categories, which must be expressed in terms of the objectives,
measures and metrics. The objectives and the indicators, measures
and metrics used by the charter school must be consistent with the
performance framework adopted by the sponsor pursuant to
NRS 388A.270.
4. A resume and background information for each person who
serves on the board of the charter management organization or the
committee to form a charter school, as applicable, which must
include the name, telephone number, electronic mail address,
background, qualifications, any past or current affiliation with any
charter school in this State or any other state, any potential conflicts
of interest and any other information required by the sponsor.
-
*SB318_R1*

– 9 –
5. The proposed location of, or the geographic area to be
served by, the charter school and evidence of a need and community
support for the charter school in that area.
6. The minimum, planned and maximum projected enrollment
of pupils in each grade in the charter school for each year that the
charter school would operate under the proposed charter contract.
7. The procedure for applying for enrollment in the proposed
charter school, which must include, without limitation, the proposed
dates for accepting applications for enrollment in each year of
operation under the proposed charter contract and a statement of
whether the charter school will enroll pupils who are in a particular
category of at-risk pupils before enrolling other children who are
eligible to attend the charter school pursuant to NRS 388A.456 and
the method for determining eligibility for enrollment in each such
category of at-risk pupils served by the charter school.
8. The academic program that the charter school proposes to
use, a description of how the academic program complies with the
requirements of NRS 388A.366, the proposed academic calendar for
the first year of operation and a sample daily schedule for a pupil in
each grade served by the charter school.
9. A description of the proposed instructional design of the
charter school and the type of learning environment the charter
school will provide, including, without limitation, whether the
charter school will provide a program of distance education,
the planned class size and structure, the proposed curriculum for the
charter school and the teaching methods that will be used at the
charter school.
10. The manner in which the charter school plans to identify
and serve the needs of pupils with disabilities, pupils who are
English learners, pupils who are academically behind their peers and
gifted pupils.
11. A description of any co-curricular or extracurricular
activities that the charter school plans to offer and the manner in
which these programs will be funded.
12. Any uniform or dress code policy that the charter school
plans to use.
13. Plans and timelines for recruiting and enrolling students,
including procedures for any lottery for admission that the charter
school plans to conduct.
14. The rules of behavior and punishments that the charter
school plans to adopt pursuant to NRS 388A.495, including, without
limitation, any unique discipline policies for pupils with disabilities.
15. A chart that clearly presents the proposed organizational
structure of the charter school and a clear description of the roles
and responsibilities of the governing body, administrators and any
-
*SB318_R1*

– 10 –
other persons included on the chart and a table summarizing the
decision-making responsibilities of the staff and governing body of
the charter school and, if applicable, the charter management
organization that operates the charter school. The table must also
identify the person responsible for each activity conducted by the
charter school, including, without limitation, the person responsible
for establishing curriculum and culture, providing professional
development to employees of the charter school and making
determinations concerning the staff of the charter school.
16. The names of any external organizations that will play a
role in operating the charter school and the role each such
organization will play.
17. The manner in which the governing body of the charter
school will be chosen.
18. A staffing chart for the first year in which the charter
school plans to operate and a projected staffing plan for the term of
the charter contract.
19. Plans for recruiting administrators, teachers and other staff,
providing professional development to such staff.
20. Proposed bylaws for the governing body, a description of
the manner in which the charter school will be governed, including,
without limitation, any governance training that will be provided to
the governing body, and a code of ethics for members and
employees of the governing body. The code of ethics must be
prepared with guidance from the Nevada Commission on Ethics and
must not conflict with any policy adopted by the sponsor.
21. Explanations of any partnerships or contracts central to the
operations or mission of the charter school.
22. A statement of whether the charter school will provide for
the transportation of pupils to and from the charter school. If the
charter school will provide transportation, the application must
include the proposed plan for the transportation of pupils. If the
charter school will not provide transportation, the application must
include a statement that the charter school will work with the
parents and guardians of pupils enrolled in the charter school to
develop a plan for transportation to ensure that pupils have access to
transportation to and from the charter school.
23. The procedure for the evaluation of teachers of the charter
school, if different from the procedure prescribed in NRS 391.680
and 391.725. If the procedure is different from the procedure
prescribed in NRS 391.680 and 391.725, the procedure for the
evaluation of teachers of the charter school must provide the same
level of protection and otherwise comply with the standards for
evaluation set forth in NRS 391.680 and 391.725.
-
*SB318_R1*

– 11 –
24. A statement of the charter school’s plans for food service
and other significant operational services, including a statement of
whether the charter school will provide food service or participate in
the National School Lunch Program, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1751 et seq. If
the charter school will not provide food service or participate in the
National School Lunch Program, the application must include an
explanation of the manner in which the charter school will ensure
that the lack of such food service or participation does not prevent
pupils from attending the charter school.
25. Opportunities and expectations for involving the parents of
pupils enrolled in the charter school in instruction at the charter
school and the operation of the charter school, including, without
limitation, the manner in which the charter school will solicit input
concerning the governance of the charter school from such parents.
26. A detailed plan for starting operation of the charter school
that identifies necessary tasks, the persons responsible for
performing them and the dates by which such tasks will be
accomplished.
27. A description of the financial plan and policies to be used
by the charter school.
28. A description of the insurance coverage the charter school
will obtain.
29. Budgets for starting operation at the charter school, the first
year of operation of the charter school and the first 5 years of
operation of the charter school, with any assumptions inherent in the
budgets clearly stated.
30. Evidence of any money pledged or contributed to the
budget of the charter school.
31. A statement of the facilities that will be used to operate the
charter school and a plan for operating such facilities, including,
without limitation, any backup plan to be used if the charter school
cannot be operated out of the planned facilities.
32. If the charter school operates a vocational school, a
description of the career and technical education program that will
be used by the charter school.
33. If the charter school will provide a program of distance
education, a description of the system of course credits that the
charter school will use and the manner in which the charter school
will:
(a) Monitor and verify the participation in and completion of
courses by pupils;
(b) Require pupils to participate in assessments and submit
course work;
(c) Conduct parent-teacher conferences; and
-
*SB318_R1*

– 12 –
(d) Administer any test, examination or assessment required by
state or federal law in a proctored setting.
34. If the charter school will provide a program where a
student may earn college credit for courses taken in high school, a
draft memorandum of understanding between the charter school and
the college or university through which the credits will be earned
and a term sheet, which must set forth:
(a) The proposed duration of the relationship between the
charter school and the college or university and the conditions for
renewal and termination of the relationship;
(b) The roles and responsibilities of the governing body of the
charter school, the employees of the charter school and the college
or university;
(c) The scope of the services and resources that will be provided
by the college or university;
(d) The manner and amount that the college or university will be
compensated for providing such services and resources, including,
without limitation, any tuition and fees that pupils at the charter
school will pay to the college or university;
(e) The manner in which the college or university will ensure
that the charter school effectively monitors pupil enrollment and
attendance and the acquisition of college credits; and
(f) Any employees of the college or university who will serve on
the governing body of the charter school.
35. If the applicant currently operates a charter school in
another state, evidence of the performance of such charter schools
and the capacity of the applicant to operate the proposed charter
school.
36. If the applicant proposes to contract with [an educational
management organization or any other] a person to provide
educational or management services:
(a) Evidence of the performance of the [educational
management organization or other] person when providing such
services to a population of pupils similar to the population that will
be served by the proposed charter school;
(b) A term sheet that sets forth:
(1) The proposed duration of the proposed contract between
the governing body of the charter school and the [educational
management organization;] person;
(2) A description of the responsibilities of the governing
body of the charter school, employees of the charter school and the
[educational management organization or other] person;
(3) All fees that will be paid to the [educational management
organization or other] person;
-
*SB318_R1*

– 13 –
(4) The manner in which the governing body of the charter
school will oversee the services provided by the [educational
management organization or other] person and enforce the terms of
the contract;
(5) A disclosure of the investments made by the [educational
management organization or other] person in the proposed charter
school; and
(6) The conditions for renewal and termination of the
contract; and
(c) A disclosure of any conflicts of interest concerning the
applicant and the [educational management organization or other]
person, including, without limitation, any past or current
employment, business or familial relationship between any
prospective employee of the charter school and a member of the
committee to form a charter school or the board of directors of the
charter management organization, as applicable.
37. Any additional information that the sponsor determines is
necessary to evaluate the ability of the proposed charter school to
serve pupils in the school district in which the proposed charter
school will be located.
 As used in this section, “pupil with a disability” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 388.417.
Sec. 6. NRS 388A.249 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.249 1. A committee to form a charter school or charter
management organization may submit the application to the
proposed sponsor of the charter school. If an application proposes to
convert an existing public school, homeschool or other program of
home study into a charter school, the proposed sponsor shall deny
the application.
2. The proposed sponsor of a charter school shall, in reviewing
an application to form a charter school:
(a) Assemble a team of reviewers, which may include, without
limitation, natural persons from different geographic areas of the
United States who possess the appropriate knowledge and expertise
with regard to the academic, financial and organizational experience
of charter schools, to review and evaluate the application;
(b) Conduct a thorough evaluation of the application, which
includes an in-person interview with the applicant designed to elicit
any necessary clarifications or additional information about the
proposed charter school and determine the ability of the applicants
to establish a high-quality charter school;
(c) Consider the degree to which the proposed charter school
will address the needs identified in the evaluation prepared by the
proposed sponsor pursuant to subsection 6 or 7 of NRS 388A.220,
as applicable;
-
*SB318_R1*

– 14 –
(d) If the proposed sponsor is not the board of trustees of a
school district, solicit input from the board of trustees of the school
district in which the proposed charter school will be located;
(e) Base its determination on documented evidence collected
through the process of reviewing the application;
(f) Adhere to the policies and practices developed by the
proposed sponsor pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 388A.223; and
(g) Consider the academic, financial and organizational
performance of any charter schools that currently hold a contract
with the proposed operators, including, without limitation, a charter
management organization , [or educational management
organization,] of the proposed charter school.
3. The proposed sponsor of a charter school may approve an
application to form a charter school only if the proposed sponsor
determines that:
(a) The application:
(1) Complies with this chapter and the regulations applicable
to charter schools; and
(2) Is complete in accordance with the regulations of the
Department and the policies and practices of the sponsor;
(b) The applicant has demonstrated competence in accordance
with the criteria for approval prescribed by the sponsor pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 388A.223 that will likely result in a successful
opening and operation of the charter school;
(c) Based on the most recent evaluation prepared by the
proposed sponsor pursuant to subsection 6 or 7 of NRS 388A.220,
as applicable, the proposed charter school will address one or more
of the needs identified in the evaluation; and
(d) It has received sufficient input from the public, including,
without limitation, input received at the meeting held pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 388A.252 or subsection 1 of NRS 388A.255,
as applicable.
4. The identity of each member of the team of reviewers
assembled by a proposed sponsor of a charter school is confidential
for 5 years after the review of an application to form a charter
school is complete and must not be disclosed unless ordered by a
district court in an action brought pursuant to subsection 3 of
NRS 388A.255.
5. On or before January 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction shall submit a written report to
the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to
the next regular session of the Legislature. The report must include:
(a) A list of each application to form a charter school that was
submitted to the board of trustees of a school district, the State
-
*SB318_R1*

– 15 –
Public Charter School Authority, a college or a university or a city
or county during the immediately preceding biennium;
(b) The educational focus of each charter school for which an
application was submitted;
(c) The current status of the application; and
(d) If the application was denied, the reasons for the denial.
Sec. 7. NRS 388A.276 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.276 The governing body of a charter school may submit
to the sponsor of the charter school a written request for an
amendment of the charter contract. The sponsor of the charter
school shall consider the academic, financial and organizational
performance of any charter schools that currently hold a contract
with the current or proposed operators, including, without limitation,
a charter management organization , [or educational management
organization,] of the charter school. If the proposed amendment
complies with the provisions of this chapter and any other statute or
regulation applicable to charter schools, the sponsor and the
governing body of the charter school may amend the charter
contract in accordance with the proposed amendment. If the sponsor
denies the request for an amendment, the sponsor shall provide
written notice to the governing body of the charter school setting
forth the reasons for the denial.
Sec. 8. NRS 388A.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.320 1. Unless a waiver is granted pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 388A.243, the governing body of a charter
school must consist of:
(a) One member who is a teacher or other person licensed
pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS or who previously held such a
license and is retired, as long as his or her license was held in good
standing.
(b) One member who:
(1) Satisfies the qualifications of paragraph (a); or
(2) Is a school administrator with a license issued by another
state or who previously held such a license and is retired, as long as
his or her license was held in good standing.
(c) One parent or legal guardian of a pupil enrolled in the charter
school who is not a teacher or an administrator at the charter school.
(d) Two members who possess knowledge and experience in
one or more of the following areas:
(1) Accounting;
(2) Financial services;
(3) Law; or
(4) Human resources.
2. In addition to the members who serve pursuant to subsection
1, the governing body of a charter school may include, without
-
*SB318_R1*

– 16 –
limitation, parents and representatives of nonprofit organizations
and businesses. Unless a waiver is granted pursuant to subsection 2
of NRS 388A.243, not more than two persons who serve on the
governing body may represent the same organization or business or
otherwise represent the interests of the same organization or
business. A majority of the members of the governing body must
reside in this State. If the membership of the governing body
changes, the governing body shall provide written notice to the
sponsor of the charter school within 10 working days after such
change.
3. A person may serve on the governing body only if the
person submits an affidavit to the sponsor of the charter school
indicating that the person:
(a) Has not been convicted of a felony relating to serving on the
governing body of a charter school or any offense involving moral
turpitude.
(b) Has received training or read and understands material
concerning the roles and responsibilities of members of governing
bodies of charter schools and other training and material designed to
assist the governing bodies of charter schools, if such training and
material is provided to the person by the sponsor or an application to
form a charter school or amend a charter contract provides that the
member would receive such training or read and understand such
material.
(c) Complies with the requirements of NRS 388A.323.
4. A person who wishes to serve on the governing body shall
disclose to the sponsor of the charter school any conflicts of interest
concerning the person or any family member of the person and a
charter management organization [, educational management
organization] or other person with which the governing body of the
charter school has entered into a contract to provide any services at
the charter school in the immediately preceding year.
5. The governing body of a charter school is a public body. It is
hereby given such reasonable and necessary powers, not conflicting
with the Constitution and the laws of the State of Nevada, as may be
requisite to attain the ends for which the charter school is
established and to promote the welfare of pupils who are enrolled in
the charter school.
6. The governing body of a charter school shall, during each
calendar quarter, hold at least one regularly scheduled public
meeting in the county in which a facility operated by the charter
school where pupils receive instruction is located. Upon an
affirmative vote of a majority of the membership of the governing
body, each member is entitled to receive a salary of not more than
-
*SB318_R1*

– 17 –
$80 for attendance at each meeting, as fixed by the governing body,
not to exceed payment for more than one meeting per month.
7. As used in subsection 1, “teacher” means a person who:
(a) Holds a current license to teach issued pursuant to chapter
391 of NRS or who previously held such a license and is retired, as
long as his or her license was held in good standing; and
(b) Has at least 2 years of experience as an employed teacher.
 The term does not include a person who is employed as a
substitute teacher.
Sec. 9. NRS 388A.352 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.352 Each year, each governing body of a charter school
shall post on its Internet website the definition of a charter
management organization [and an educational management
organization] and whether the charter school is operated by a charter
management organization [or receives services from an educational
management organization] and, if so, the name of the charter
management organization . [or educational management
organization.]
Sec. 10. NRS 388A.378 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.378 1. The governing body of a charter school may
contract with the board of trustees of the school district in which the
charter school is located or in which a pupil enrolled in the charter
school resides, with the Nevada System of Higher Education or with
a city or county for the provision of facilities to operate the charter
school or to perform any service relating to the operation of the
charter school, including, without limitation, transportation, the
provision of health services for the pupils who are enrolled in
the charter school and the provision of school police officers. If the
board of trustees of a school district, a college or university within
the Nevada System of Higher Education or a city or county is the
sponsor of the charter school, the governing body and the sponsor
must enter into a service agreement pursuant to NRS 388A.381
before the provision of such services other than for the provision of
school police officers when the provisions of NRS 388A.384 apply.
If the board of trustees of a school district provides services to a
charter school pursuant to this section or NRS 388A.474, it shall not
charge more than its cost for providing such services determined on
a cost per pupil basis.
2. A charter school may use any public facility located within
the school district in which the charter school is located. A charter
school may use school buildings owned by the school district only
upon approval of the board of trustees of the school district.
3. The board of trustees of a school district may donate surplus
personal property of the school district to a charter school that is
located within the school district.
-
*SB318_R1*

– 18 –
4. A charter school may:
(a) Acquire by construction, purchase, devise, gift, exchange or
lease, or any combination of those methods, and construct,
reconstruct, improve, maintain, equip and furnish any building,
structure or property to be used for any of its educational purposes
and the related appurtenances, easements, rights-of-way,
improvements, paving, utilities, landscaping, parking facilities and
lands;
(b) Mortgage, pledge or otherwise encumber all or any part of
its property or assets;
(c) Borrow money and otherwise incur indebtedness; and
(d) Use public money to purchase real property or buildings
with the approval of the sponsor.
5. A charter school shall provide written notice to the sponsor
of the charter school of any project for the new construction,
repair or reconstruction of any building, structure, facility or
property, regardless of ownership, used for any of the educational
purposes of the charter school if the estimated cost of the project
exceeds $100,000. A charter school shall provide to the sponsor
for each such project:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 388A.635,
documentation of compliance with the requirements for
competitive bidding set forth in chapter 338 of NRS; and
(b) The record received by the charter school each month
pursuant to subsection 6 of NRS 338.070 for the project.
Sec. 11. NRS 388A.393 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.393 1. A contract or a proposed contract between a
charter school or a proposed charter school and a contractor [or an
educational management organization] must not:
(a) Give to the contractor [or educational management
organization] direct control of educational services, financial
decisions, the appointment of members of the governing body, or
the hiring and dismissal of an administrator or financial officer of
the charter school or proposed charter school;
(b) Authorize the payment of loans, advances or other monetary
charges from the contractor [or educational management
organization] which are greater than 15 percent of the total expected
funding received by the charter school or proposed charter school
from the State Education Fund;
(c) Require the charter school or proposed charter school to
prepay any fees to the contractor ; [or educational management
organization;]
(d) Require the charter school or proposed charter school to pay
the contractor [or educational management organization] before the
-
*SB318_R1*

– 19 –
payment of other obligations of the charter school or proposed
charter school during a period of financial distress;
(e) Allow a contractor [or educational management
organization] to cause a delay in the repayment of a loan or other
money advanced by the contractor [or educational management
organization] to the charter school or proposed charter school,
which delay would increase the cost to the charter school or
proposed charter school of repaying the loan or advance;
(f) Require the charter school or proposed charter school to
enroll a minimum number of pupils for the continuation of the
contract between the charter school or proposed charter school and
the contractor ; [or educational management organization;]
(g) Require the charter school or proposed charter school to
request or borrow money from this State to pay the contractor ; [or
educational management organization if the contractor or
educational management organization will provide financial
management to the charter school or proposed charter school;]
(h) Contain a provision which restricts the ability of the charter
school or proposed charter school to borrow money from a person or
entity other than the contractor ; [or educational management
organization;]
(i) Provide for the allocation to the charter school or proposed
charter school of any indirect cost incurred by the contractor ; [or
educational management organization;]
(j) Authorize the payment of fees to the contractor [or
educational management organization] which are not attributable to
the actual services provided by the contractor ; [or educational
management organization;]
(k) Allow any money received by the charter school or proposed
charter school from this State or from the board of trustees of a
school district to be transferred to or deposited in a bank, credit
union or other financial institution outside this State, including
money controlled by the contractor ; [or educational management
organization;]
(l) [Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, provide]
Provide incentive fees to the contractor ; [or educational
management organization. A contract or a proposed contract may
provide to the contractor or educational management organization
incentive fees that are based on the academic improvement of pupils
enrolled in the charter school;]
(m) Require automatic renewal of the contract or provide that
the contract remains in effect if the governing body of a charter
school is reconstituted or a charter contract is terminated pursuant to
NRS 388A.300 or 388A.330, as applicable;
-
*SB318_R1*

– 20 –
(n) Contain any provision that would delay or prevent the
approval of an application by the governing body of the charter
school for an exemption from federal taxation pursuant to 26 U.S.C.
§ 501(c)(3);
(o) Require the governing body of the charter school to pay any
costs associated with ensuring [that services comply] the contractor
is in compliance with state and federal law;
(p) Provide that the contractor [or educational management
organization] is not liable for failing to comply with the
requirements of the contract; or
(q) Provide for the enforcement of terms of the contract that
conflict with an applicable charter contract or federal or state law.
2. As used in this section, “contractor” [or “educational
management organization” means] :
(a) Means a corporation, business, organization or other entity [,
whether or not conducted for profit,] that directly employs and
provides personnel with whom a committee to form a charter school
or the governing body of a charter school, as applicable, contracts to
[assist with the operation, management or provision and
implementation of educational] provide professional, licensed
professional, health care or other operational services and
programs [of] to the charter school or proposed charter school. [The
term includes a corporation, business, organization or other entity
that directly employs and provides personnel to a charter school or
proposed charter school.]
(b) Does not include a for-profit entity that contracts with and
is accountable to the governing body of a charter school to provide
centralized support or operations, including, without limitation,
educational, administrative, management, compliance or
instructional services or staff, to the charter school.
Sec. 12. NRS 388A.3975 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388A.3975 The governing body of a charter school shall
develop a policy for accepting, investigating and responding to
complaints and submit the policy to the State Public Charter School
Authority for review and approval. Such a policy may allow for a
complaint to be delegated to the staff of the charter school [or an
educational management organization] if the policy allows a
complaining party who does not believe the staff of the charter
school [or educational management organization] has adequately
addressed a complaint to submit the complaint to the governing
body of the charter school for its investigation and response.
Sec. 13. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, on
or after the effective date of this act, a charter school shall not enter
-
*SB318_R1*

– 21 –
into or renew any contract with an educational management
organization, as that term was defined on January 1, 2025.
2. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of this act, if a
charter school entered into a contract on or after July 1, 2023, with
an educational management organization, as that term was defined
on January 1, 2025, the charter school may renew the contract only
one time for a term of not more than 2 years.
Sec. 14. NRS 388A.030, 388A.353 and 388A.354 are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 15. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTIONS
388A.030 “Educational management organization” defined.
“Educational management organization” means a for-profit entity
that contracts with and is accountable to the governing body of a
charter school to provide centralized support or operations,
including, without limitation, educational, administrative,
management, compliance or instructional services or staff, to the
charter school.
388A.353 Biennial reports of amounts paid to educational
management organizations. On or before November 1 of each
even-numbered year, the governing body of each charter school that
enters into a contract with an educational management organization
shall submit to the sponsor of the charter school a report that
includes the amount paid to the educational management
organization in the current and immediately preceding fiscal years.
On or before November 1 of each even-numbered year, each
sponsor of a charter school that enters into a contract with an
educational management organization shall submit to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to the next regular
session of the Legislature a report that includes the amount paid to
the educational management organization by the charter school in
the current and immediately preceding fiscal years.
388A.354 Disclosure of information relating to charter
management organizations and educational management
organizations; reports.
1. The governing body of a charter school that receives
services from an educational management organization shall:
(a) Post to the Internet website of the charter school:
-
*SB318_R1*

– 22 –
(1) Each financial audit and each performance audit of the
charter school required by the Department pursuant to NRS
388A.105 or 388A.110;
(2) Information on the contract with the charter management
organization or the educational management organization,
including, without limitation:
(I) The amount of money received by the educational
management organization from public and private sources to carry
out the terms of the contract;
(II) The expenditures of the educational management
organization relating to carrying out the contract, including, without
limitation, the payment of salaries, benefits and bonuses; and
(III) An identification of each contract, transaction and
agreement entered into by the educational management organization
relating to carrying out the contract with the charter school,
including, without limitation, contracts, transactions and agreements
with parent organizations, subsidiaries and partnerships of the
educational management organization; and
(3) To the extent practicable, information on any contract
between a member of the governing body of the charter school or
any member of the family of the member of the governing body and
another charter school, sponsor of a charter school, charter
management organization or educational management organization.
(b) Submit information on the contract with the educational
management organization and a letter describing whether the
governing body of the charter school is satisfied with the contractual
relationship with the educational management organization to the
sponsor of the charter school.
2. The sponsor of a charter school may, after reviewing the
information provided pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1,
request additional information, conduct an investigation or
otherwise take action relating to the information received by the
sponsor of the charter school.
3. On or before December 15 of each odd-numbered year, the
sponsor of a charter school that receives information on a contract
between the governing body of a charter school and an educational
management organization pursuant to subsection 1 shall submit a
report of such information to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Education.
H
-
*SB318_R1*